Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 3. Miscellaneous

§ 10-4-301.
Sovereignty in space above state.

Sovereignty in the space above the lands and waters of this state is declared to rest in the state except where assumed by the United States law.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 4-105; C.S. 1945, § 33-205; W.S. 1957, § 10-31; W.S. 1977, § 10-3-105; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.

§ 10-4-302.
Ownership of space.

The ownership of the space above the lands and waters of this state is declared to be vested in the several owners of the surface beneath subject to the right of flight described in W.S.

10-4-303

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 4-106; C.S. 1945, § 33-206; W.S. 1957, § 10-32; W.S. 1977, § 10-3-106; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.

Airplane overflight, without impact on surface, not “taking”of property. —

The mere fact of airplane overflight, without evidence of impact on the surface (i.e., substantial interference with the use and enjoyment of the surface), did not create a constitutional claim against either the city or its airport board, which adopted an ordinance providing a height limitation in a noninstrument approach zone to the airport, for the “taking” of property through the creation of a flight easement. In addition, the flight easement utilized by airplanes was not created by the passage of the ordinance, but by federal and state declarations of public navigability and by repeated overflights which preceded the home owner's action by considerably more than the 10 years allowed by the applicable statute of limitations (§

1-3-103

). Cheyenne Airport Bd. v. Rogers, 707 P.2d 717,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 579

(Wyo. 1985).

Height limitation in noninstrument approach zone to airportlegitimate exercise of police power. —

A city ordinance providing a height limitation in a noninstrument approach zone to an airport was an exercise of the police power, and certain homeowners who had a tree in violation of this limitation, who were notified they would have to trim it, and who challenged the constitutionality of the ordinance, failed to demonstrate such a significant impact on their plot as a whole as to counter balance the significant public interest in protecting the airport flight path. Cheyenne Airport Bd. v. Rogers, 707 P.2d 717,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 579

(Wyo. 1985).

§ 10-4-303.
Low or dangerous flight; landing on land or water of another.

Flight of aircraft, including unmanned aircraft or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft, over the lands and waters of this state is lawful unless it is:

At such a low altitude as to interfere with the existing use to which the land or water, or the space over the land or water, is put by the owner;

Conducted as to be imminently dangerous to persons or property lawfully on the land or water; or

In violation of the air commerce regulations promulgated by the department of transportation of the United States.

The landing of an aircraft, including an unmanned aircraft or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft, on the lands or waters of another, without his consent, is unlawful, except in the case of a forced landing. For damages caused by a forced landing, however, the owner, operator or lessee of the aircraft or the airman shall be liable for actual damage caused by the forced landing.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent an operator or pilot from operating an aircraft, including an unmanned aircraft or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft, over his own property.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 4-107; C.S. 1945, § 33-207; W.S. 1957, § 10-33; W.S. 1977, § 10-3-107; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 2017 ch. 170, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2018 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

Applied

in

Cheyenne Airport Bd. v. Rogers, 707 P.2d 717,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 579

(Wyo. 1985).

The 2017 amendment

at the beginning of (a) substituted “Flight of aircraft, including unmanned aircraft,” for “Flight in aircraft”; near the beginning of (b) added “including unmanned aircraft” and added “operator” following “the owner” in the last sentence; added (c); and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 170, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2018 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), in (b), and in (c), inserted “or vertical takeoff and landing aircraft” following “unmanned aircraft”.

Laws 2018, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

§ 10-4-304.
Interpretation of chapter.

W.S.

10-4-101

through

10-4-304

shall be construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it and to harmonize, as far as possible, with federal laws and regulations on the subject of aeronautics.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 4-109; C.S. 1945, § 33-209; W.S. 1957, § 10-35; W.S. 1977, § 10-3-109; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.

Applied

in

Cheyenne Airport Bd. v. Rogers, 707 P.2d 717,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 579

(Wyo. 1985).

§ 10-4-305.
Marking obstructions.

All structures located outside the exterior boundaries of any incorporated city, town or recorded subdivision, whose appearance is not otherwise mandated by state or federal law, rule or regulation, shall be lighted, marked, painted, flagged or otherwise constructed to be recognizable in clear air during daylight hours from a distance of not less than two thousand (2,000) feet if the structure meets all of the following criteria:

Is fifty (50) feet in height above the ground or higher;

Is a structure associated with the development or study of wind powered electric generation, commonly known as a meteorological tower or “met tower”;

Was erected, raised after being lowered, purchased or leased on or after the effective date of this act.

Every person owning or leasing a structure which meets the requirements of paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section shall report to the Wyoming department of transportation the structure’s exact location, height above the ground, owner, the method used to make the structure visible and other information the department may deem necessary for the safety of flight. Reports shall be filed on or before April 30, 2009 for every structure erected prior to April 30, 2009, to which this subsection applies. After April 30, 2009, a report shall be filed not less than ten (10) days prior to raising or erecting any structure subject to this subsection.

Any person removing a structure subject to the reporting requirements of this section shall report such removal within ten (10) days to the Wyoming department of transportation.

Within five (5) days of receiving data reported under subsection (b) or (c) of this section, the department of transportation shall make the data, other than the ownership of a structure, available to the public. Data concerning the ownership of a structure shall not be a public record under the Wyoming Public Records Act, W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

.

The Wyoming department of transportation shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 133, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 133, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2009.